Utah statutes.
26-28-117.   Other prohibited acts.

A person that, in order to obtain a financial gain, intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates a document of gift, an amendment, or revocation of a document of gift, or a refusal commits a third degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 60, 2007 General Session

